tests/morphophonology/ya.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../../kaz.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../../kaz.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "[twol] aorist with я":
    құй<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : құяды
    құй<v><tv><aor><p1><sg> : құямын
    қой<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : қояды
    қой<v><tv><aor><p1><sg> : қоямын
    қай<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : қаяды
    қай<v><tv><aor><p1><sg> : қаямын
    қи<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : қияды
    қи<v><tv><aor><p1><sg> : қиямын

  "[twol] future with я":
    құй<v><tv><gpr_fut><subst><acc> : құярды
    құй<v><tv><fut><p1><sg> : құярмын
    қой<v><tv><gpr_fut><subst><acc> : қоярды
    қой<v><tv><fut><p1><sg> : қоярмын
    қай<v><tv><gpr_fut><subst><acc> : қаярды
    қи<v><tv><fut><p1><sg> : қиярмын
    қи<v><tv><gpr_fut><subst><acc> : қиярды
    қай<v><tv><fut><p1><sg> : қаярмын

  "[twol] future after у with а":
    қу<v><tv><fut><p3><sg> : қуар

  "[twol] future after и with е":
    ки<v><tv><fut><p3><sg> : киер
